scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakobatood
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawagaakobatood
     aazhawagaakomotoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaakomotoo
     aazhawagaakomotoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakomotoo
     aazhawagaakomotoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakomotood
     aazhawagaamebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaamebatoo
     aazhawagaamebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaamebatoo
     aazhawagaamebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaamebatood
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaazii
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaazii
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawagaazii
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawagaazii
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaazii
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaaziid
     aazhawagaazii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawagaaziid
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaaziibatoo
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaaziibatoo
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawagaaziibatoo
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawagaaziibatoo
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaaziibatoo 
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaaziibatood
     aazhawagaaziibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawagaaziibatood
     aazhawa'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawa'adoo
     aazhawa'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'adoo
     aazhawa'adoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'adood
     aazhawa'adoobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawa'adoobatoo
     aazhawa'adoobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawa'adoobatoo
     aazhawa'adoobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawa'adoobatoo
     aazhawa'adoobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'adoobatoo
     aazhawa'adoobatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'adoobatood
     aazhawasaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawasaa
     aazhawasaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawasaa
     aazhawasaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawasaad
     aazhawasaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawasaad
     aazhawasaa+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: aazhawasaan
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaadagaa
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaadagaa
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaadagaa
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaa 
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaad
     aazhawaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaadagaad
     aazhawaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaadagaakobatoo
     aazhawaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaadagaakobatoo
     aazhawaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaakobatoo
     aazhawaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaakobatood
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaadagaaziibatoo
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaadagaaziibatoo
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaadagaaziibatoo
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaaziibatoo
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaaziibatood
     aazhawaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaadagaaziibatood
     aazhawaakwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaakwii
     aazhawaakwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwii
     aazhawaakwii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwiid
     aazhawaakwii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaakwiid
